District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-201.04

Trustees — Duties; qualifications; annual election.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1285, ch. 854, § 608
July 13, 1959, 73 Stat. 181, Pub. L. 86-83
Apr. 22, 1960, 74 Stat. 78, Pub. L. 86-436
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-201.04.
1981 Ed., § 29-204.
1973 Ed., § 29-204.